Illinois, session 104th, SB349.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Native Prairie and Forage Preference Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (525 ILCS 27/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Native Prairie and Forage Preference Act.9(Source: P.A. 101-76, eff. 1-1-20.)